fr: Type de quille: Biquille; Quille à bulbe; Quille pendulaire; Quille-dérive; Quille à aileron; Quille longue; Quillard; Quille relevable; Quille pivotante; Quille à ailettes; Autre
tr: Omurga tipi: Sintine/Çift omurga; Torpil omurga; Eğilebilen omurga; Salma omurga; Yüzgeç omurga; Tam omurga; Salma tahtası; Kaldırılabilir omurga; Döner omurga; Kanatlı omurga; Diğer
ko: 킬 유형: 빌지/트윈 킬; 벌브 킬; 캔팅 킬; 센터보드 킬; 핀 킬; 풀 킬; 킬보드; 리프팅 킬; 스윙 킬; 윙 킬; 기타
da: Køltype: Kimingkøl/dobbeltkøl; Bulbkøl; Vippekøl; Sænkekøl; Finkøl; Lang køl; Kølbåd; Løftekøl; Svingkøl; Vingekøl; Andet
zh-CN: 龙骨类型: 舭龙骨/双龙骨; 球状龙骨; 摆式龙骨; 稳向板龙骨; 鳍状龙骨; 全长龙骨; 龙骨板; 升降龙骨; 摆动龙骨; 翼状龙骨; 其他
el: Τύπος καρίνας: Διπλή τρόπιδα; Τρόπιδα με βολβό; Ανακλινόμενη τρόπιδα; Ανασυρόμενη τρόπιδα; Τρόπιδα τύπου πτερυγίου; Πλήρης τρόπιδα; Σανίδα τρόπιδας; Ανυψούμενη τρόπιδα; Περιστρεφόμενη τρόπιδα; Τρόπιδα με πτερύγια; Άλλο
ru: Тип киля: Скуловой/двойной киль; Бульбкиль; Качающийся киль; Шверт; Плавниковый киль; Длинный киль; Килевая доска; Подъемный киль; Поворотный киль; Крылатый киль; Другое
ja: キールタイプ: ビルジ/ツインキール; バルブキール; キャンティングキール; センターボードキール; フィンキール; フルキール; キールボード; リフティングキール; スイングキール; ウィングキール; その他
nb: Kjølens type: Slingerkjøl / dobbelkjøl; Bulbkjøl; Vippekjøl; Senterbord; Finkjøl; Langkjøl; Kjølbrett; Senkekjøl; Svingkjøl; Vingekjøl; Annet
en: Keel type: Bilge/Twin keel; Bulb keel; Canting keel; Centerboard keel; Fin keel; Full keel; Keelboard; Lifting keel; Swing keel; Wing keel; Other
cs: Typ kýlu: Boční / dvojitý kýl; Kýl s bulbou; Naklápěcí kýl; Ploutvový kýl; Pevný ploutvový kýl; Plný kýl; Kýlová ploutev; Zvedací kýl; Sklopný kýl; Křidélkový kýl; Jiné
zh-TW: 龍骨類型: 舭龍骨/雙龍骨; 球鼻龍骨; 傾斜式龍骨; 穩向板龍骨; 鰭板龍骨; 全龍骨; 龍骨板; 升降式龍骨; 擺動式龍骨; 翼狀龍骨; 其他
pl: Typ kila: Stępka podwójna (bilge keel); Stępka z bulbo-balastem; Stępka wychylna; Stępka z mieczem; Stępka płetwowa; Stępka długa; Miecz stępkowy; Stępka podnoszona; Stępka obrotowa; Stępka ze skrzydełkami; Inny
pt-BR: Quilha tipo: Bolina/Quilha dupla; Quilha de bulbo; Quilha pivotante; Quilha central retrátil; Quilha de barbatana; Quilha longa; Keelboard; Quilha retrátil; Quilha basculante; Quilha com asa; Outra
sv: Költyp: Slagköl/dubbelköl; Bulbköl; Svängköl; Centerbord; Fenköl; Långköl; Kölbord; Lyftköl; Fällköl; Vingköl; Övrigt
de: Kieltyp: Kimmkiel/Doppelkiel; Bulbkiel; Neigekiel; Schwertkiel; Finnenkiel; Langkiel; Kielschwert; Hubkiel; Schwenkkiel; Flügelkiel; Sonstige
hr-HR: Vrsta kobilice: Ljuljna / dvojna kobilica; Kobilica s bulbom; Nagibna kobilica; Pomična kobilica; Perajasta kobilica; Puna kobilica; Daska s kobilicom; Podizna kobilica; Zakretna kobilica; Krilna kobilica; Ostalo
lt-LT: Kylio tipas: Dvigubas kilis; Kilis su bulbu; Pakreipiamas kilis; Švertas; Peleko formos kilis; Ilgasis kilis; Kilinė lenta; Keliamas kilis; Atlenkiamas kilis; Sparninis kilis; Kita
sk-SK: Typ kýlu: Bočný/Dvojitý kýl; Cibuľový kýl; Výkyvný kýl; Kýl so stredovou doskou; Plútvový kýl; Dlhý kýl; Kýlová doska; Zdvíhací kýl; Sklopný kýl; Krídelkový kýl; Iné
nl: Type kiel: Kimkiel/dubbele kiel; Bulbkiel; Kantelkiel; Midzwaardkiel; Vinkiel; Volle kiel; Kielboard; Hefkiel; Klapkiel; Vleugelkiel; Anders
th: ประเภทกระดูกงู: กระดูกงูด้านข้าง/คู่; กระดูกงูแบบกระเปาะ; กระดูกงูแบบเอียงได้; กระดูกงูแบบเซ็นเตอร์บอร์ด; กระดูกงูแบบครีบ; กระดูกงูแบบเต็ม; คีลบอร์ด; กระดูกงูแบบยกได้; กระดูกงูแบบพับได้; กระดูกงูแบบมีปีก; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de quilla: Quilla de sentina/doble; Quilla con bulbo; Quilla pivotante; Quilla de orza; Quilla de aleta; Quilla corrida; Tabla de quilla; Quilla retráctil; Quilla abatible; Quilla con alas; Otro
ro-RO: Tipul chilei (chilă): Chilă dublă/de santină; Chilă cu bulb; Chilă rabatabilă; Chilă cu derivor; Chilă fixă (Fin); Chilă lungă; Ambarcațiune cu chilă; Chilă retractabilă; Chilă pivotantă; Chilă cu aripioare; Altele
it: Tipo di chiglia: Chiglia di sentina/doppia; Chiglia a bulbo; Chiglia basculante; Chiglia a deriva mobile; Chiglia a pinna; Chiglia lunga; Keelboard; Chiglia retrattile; Chiglia pivotante; Chiglia ad alette; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de quilha: Quilha dupla; Quilha com bolbo; Quilha basculante; Quilha com patilhão; Quilha fina; Quilha corrida; Patilhão; Quilha retrátil; Quilha pivotante; Quilha com asas; Outro
bg-BG: Тип кил: Скулов/двоен кил; Бълб кил; Накланящ се кил; Кил тип шверт; Фин кил; Дълъг кил; Килборд; Повдигащ се кил; Люлеещ се кил; Кил с крила; Друго
fi: Kölin tyyppi: Palleköli / kaksoisköli; Bulbbiköli; Kääntyvä köli; Keskiköli; Eväköli; Pitkäköli; Kölilauta; Nostoköli; Kääntököli; Siipiköli; Muu
hu: Törzs típusa: Kettős tőkesúly; Bulbás tőkesúly; Dönthető tőkesúly; Svertes tőkesúly; Uszonyos tőkesúly; Teljes tőkesúly; Tőkesúlyos deszka; Emelhető tőkesúly; Felhajtható tőkesúly; Szárnyas tőkesúly; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta gredlja: Gredlj/Dvojna kobilica; Kobilica z balbom; Nihajna kobilica; Sredinska kobilica; Plavutasta kobilica; Polna kobilica; Kobilica (keelboard); Dvižna kobilica; Vrtljiva kobilica; Krilna kobilica; Drugo
vi: Loại sống thuyền: Sống phụ/Sống kép; Sống hình củ; Sống nghiêng; Sống tháo lắp; Sống hình vây; Sống toàn phần; Ván sống; Sống nâng; Sống xoay; Sống hình cánh; Khác